Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 8

Tax Anticipation Notes

9-21-801. Authorization, security, and retirement of tax anticipation notes.

The governing body of a local government may issue interest-bearing tax anticipation notes for the purpose of meeting appropriations made for the current fiscal year in anticipation of the collection of taxes and revenues of that fiscal year in amounts not exceeding sixty percent (60%) of such appropriation; provided, that the sale of the notes shall first be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The notes may be renewed from time to time and money may be borrowed from time to time for the payment of any indebtedness evidenced thereby, but all such notes shall mature not later than the close of the current fiscal year. If taxes and revenues are found to be overestimated and it becomes impossible to pay the notes prior to the close of the current fiscal year, application shall be made to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee within ten (10) days prior to the close of the current fiscal year for permission to issue funding bonds to cover the unpaid note balances in the manner provided by chapter 11 of this title, or as otherwise provided for in a manner approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 8-1; 1987, ch. 77, § 12; 2010, ch. 868, § 63.

9-21-802. Terms of tax anticipation notes.

Tax anticipation notes shall be sold at not less than par value and accrued interest. Tax anticipation notes may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be subject to such terms of redemption, without a premium, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 8-2.

9-21-803. Method of sale of tax anticipation notes.

Tax anticipation notes may be sold in such manner either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 8-3.